incubator/apertium-rup/apertium-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="al/atru__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>atru</l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âtramu</l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âtramu</l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âtrai</l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âtratâ</l><r>atru<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="al/avdu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>avdu</l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âvdamu</l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âvdamu</l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âvdai</l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âvdatâ</l><r>avdu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="al/eapidu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>eapidu</l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ipidamu</l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ipidamu</l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ipidai</l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>ipidatâ</l><r>eapidu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aludz/ăscu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>ăscu</l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>amu</l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>amu</l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ăi</l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>ătâ</l><r>ăscu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="al"><i>atru</i><par n="al/atru__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="al"><i>avdu</i><par n="al/avdu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="al"><i>eapidu</i><par n="al/eapidu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="al"><i>eapidu</i><par n="al/eapidu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="aludz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="avuț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="amâr"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="amâr"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disamâr"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="amurț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dizmurț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="anâpudz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ar"><i>avdu</i><par n="al/avdu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="arupâț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="aur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mbugâț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="cânuț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="chiur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nfrândz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disfrundz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gâlbidz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="huț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="azvur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="lândzidz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="limpidz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mâriț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="muhlidz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mulț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mușiț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="muț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ndrup"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="putridz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nsuț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="asurdz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disurdz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="urdz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nvirdz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="viștidz"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nvińiț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dizvińiț"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="zbur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="parazbur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="cacuzbur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="xenuzbur"><i>ăscu</i><par n="aludz/ăscu__vblex"/></e>
